Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1301
Standard time for Nebraska.

The standard time of the State of Nebraska shall be the time established by the Uniform Time Act of 1966 in both the Central and Rocky Mountain time zones.

Laws 1974, LB 651, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 774, § 1.